Illinois, session 104th, HB4001.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 109-2 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/109-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 109-2)7    Sec. 109-2. Person arrested in another county. 8    (a) Any person arrested in a county other than the one in 9which a warrant for his arrest was issued shall be taken 10without unnecessary delay before the nearest and most 11accessible judge in the county where the arrest was made or, if 12no additional delay is created, before the nearest and most 13accessible judge in the county from which the warrant was 14issued, unless otherwise provided in subsection (c). The judge 15may hold a hearing to determine if the defendant is the same 16person as named in the warrant.17    (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), any 18person arrested in a county other than the one in which a 19warrant for his arrest was issued, may waive the right to be 20taken before a judge in the county where the arrest was made, 21except as otherwise provided in subsection (c). If a person so 22arrested waives such right, the arresting agency shall 23surrender such person to a law enforcement agency of the   HB4001- 2 -LRB104 12424 RLC 22718 b1county that issued the warrant without unnecessary delay. The 2provisions of Section 109-1 shall then apply to the person so 3arrested.4    (c) If a person is arrested in any county and the 5prosecutor files criminal charges based on that arrest and if 6warrants is taken before a judge in any county and a warrant 7for arrest issued by any other another Illinois county exist 8exists for that person, the court in the arresting county 9shall first hold for that person a detention hearing under 10Section 110-6.1, or other hearing under Section 110-5 or 11Section 110-6, for the newly filed charges in that county. 12    (d) After the court in the arresting county has determined 13whether the person shall be released or detained on the newly 14filed charges in that county pursuant to subsection (c) 15arresting offense, the court shall then order the sheriff to 16immediately contact the sheriff in any county where any 17warrant is outstanding and notify them of the arrest of the 18individual. 19    (e) If a person has a warrant in another county for an 20offense, then, no later than 5 calendar days after the end of 21any detention issued on the charge in the arresting county, 22the county where the warrant is outstanding shall do one of the 23following: 24        (1) transport the person to the county where the 25    warrant was issued for a hearing under Section 110-6 or 26    110-6.1 in the matter for which the warrant was issued; or  HB4001- 3 -LRB104 12424 RLC 22718 b1        (2) quash the warrant and order the person released on 2    the case for which the warrant was issued only when the 3    county that issued the warrant fails to transport the 4    defendant in the timeline as proscribed; or5        (3) authorize the person's release from custody 6    pursuant to a notice to appear in court in the issuing 7    county on a date and time provided by the court in the 8    county in which the warrant was issued. 9    (f) (Blank). If the issuing county fails to take any 10action under subsection (e) within 5 calendar days, the 11defendant shall be released from custody on the warrant, and 12the circuit judge or associate circuit judge in the county of 13arrest shall set conditions of release under Section 110-5 and 14shall admit the defendant to pretrial release for his or her 15appearance before the court named in the warrant. Upon 16releasing the defendant, the circuit judge or associate 17circuit judge shall certify such a fact on the warrant and 18deliver the warrant and the acknowledgment by the defendant of 19his or her receiving the conditions of pretrial release to the 20officer having charge of the defendant from arrest and without 21delay deliver such warrant and such acknowledgment by the 22defendant of his or her receiving the conditions to the court 23before which the defendant is required to appear. 24    (g) (Blank). If a person has a warrant in another county, 25in lieu of transporting the person to the issuing county as 26outlined in subsection (e), the issuing county may hold the   HB4001- 4 -LRB104 12424 RLC 22718 b1hearing by way of a two-way audio-visual communication system 2if the accused waives the right to be physically present in 3court, the court determines that the physical health and 4safety of any person necessary to the proceedings would be 5endangered by appearing in court, or the chief judge of the 6circuit orders use of that system due to operational 7challenges in conducting the hearing in person. Such 8operational challenges must be documented and approved by the 9chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the 10challenges through reasonable efforts must be presented and 11approved by the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts 12every 6 months. 13    (h) (Blank). If more than 2 Illinois county warrants 14exist, the judge in the county of arrest shall order that the 15process described in subsections (d) through (f) occur in each 16county in whatever order the judge finds most appropriate. 17Each judge in each subsequent county shall then follow the 18rules in this Section. 19    (i) This Section applies only to warrants issued by 20Illinois state, county, or municipal courts. 21    (j) When an issuing agency is contacted by an out-of-state 22agency of a person arrested for any offense, or when an 23arresting agency is contacted by or contacts an out-of-state 24issuing agency, the Uniform Criminal Extradition Act shall 25govern. 26(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23.)